Utah statutes.
30-3-16.4.   Procedure upon filing of petition.

When a petition for conciliation is filed in the family court division of the district court, the court shall refer the matter to the domestic relations counselor or counselors and shall cause notice to be given to the spouses, by mail or in a form prescribed by the court, of the filing of the petition and of the time and place of any hearing, conference or other proceeding scheduled by the court or domestic relations counselors under this act.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1969 General Session

